Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1

General Provisions

63-3-101. “Podiatrist” defined — Performance of ankle surgery.

Within this chapter, “podiatrist” means one who examines, diagnoses or treats, medically mechanically or surgically, the ailments of the human foot, ankle and soft tissue structures extending no higher than the distal tibial metaphyseal flair, including the use and prescribing of drugs and medications, but excluding the direct applications of general anesthesia by a podiatrist and the amputation of the foot. A podiatrist may perform Achilles tendon repair, subject to subsection (b), but may not perform surgery on Pilon fractures or tibial fractures that do not enter the ankle joint.

A licensed podiatrist may perform ankle surgery only when that podiatrist meets the requirements of either subdivision (b)(1) or (b)(2):

Was, prior to October 2, 1995, credentialed to perform ankle surgery by a JCAHO accredited hospital in Tennessee or JCAHO accredited ambulatory surgical treatment center in Tennessee; provided, that a podiatrist who qualifies to perform ankle surgery under this subdivision (b)(1) must, if the podiatrist wishes to continue to perform ankle surgery:

Notify the board as to the hospital or ambulatory surgical treatment center at which the podiatrist was credentialed to perform ankle surgery prior to October 2, 1995;

Obtain and maintain evidence of obtaining at least ten (10) hours of approved continuing education related to ankle surgery annually; and

Comply with any other requirements established by the board to ensure continued proficiency in performing ankle surgery; or

Has completed a surgical residency program at least twenty-four (24) months in length that has been approved by the council on podiatric medical education and is currently eligible for certification to perform reconstructive rearfoot/ankle surgery by the American Board of Podiatric Surgery; provided, that a podiatrist who qualifies to perform ankle surgery under this subdivision (b)(2) must obtain certification to perform reconstructive rearfoot/ankle surgery from the American Board of Podiatric Surgery within six (6) years of May 24, 2000, or within six (6) years of first becoming eligible for certification, whichever date is later, and may not continue to perform ankle surgery if that podiatrist has not obtained certification by the end of the six-year period.

A licensed podiatrist may perform ankle surgery only in an accredited hospital or ambulatory surgical treatment center licensed under title 68 at which the podiatrist has surgical privileges to perform ankle surgery. For purposes of this subsection (c), an accredited hospital is one that is accredited by joint commission or the American Osteopathic Association, and an accredited ambulatory surgical treatment center is one that is accredited by joint commission, Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care or American Association for Accreditation of Ambulatory Surgical Facilities. A podiatrist who performs ankle surgery in an ambulatory surgical treatment center must first have surgical privileges to perform ankle surgery at a local hospital. A licensed podiatrist who performs ankle surgery must meet the same standard of care applicable to orthopedic surgeons who perform ankle surgery.

Licensed podiatrists may perform nonsurgical care on the ankle without meeting the requirements of subsection (b).

A licensed podiatrist may collaborate with a physician assistant or an orthopedic physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 19 of this title. A podiatrist collaborating with a physician assistant pursuant to this subsection (e) shall comply with the requirements of and any rules adopted pursuant to §§ 63-19-106 and 63-19-107 governing collaboration with a physician assistant. A podiatrist collaborating with an orthopedic physician assistant pursuant to this subsection (e) shall comply with the requirements of and any rules adopted pursuant to §§ 63-19-203 — 63-19-205 governing collaboration with an orthopedic physician assistant.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.1; Acts 1963, ch. 290, § 1; 1971, ch. 188, § 2; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-301; Acts 2000, ch. 828, § 1; 2004, ch. 668, § 1; 2009, ch. 422, § 11; 2016, ch. 946, § 1; 2018, ch. 610, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. JCAHO, referred to in this section, is the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations.”

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (e), substituted “may collaborate with” for “may supervise” in the first sentence, substituted “A podiatrist collaborating with” for “A podiatrist supervising” at the beginning of the second and third sentences, substituted “collaboration with a physician assistant” for “the supervision of a physician assistant” at the end of the second sentence, and substituted “collaboration with” for “the supervision” of in the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 610, § 42. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Assignment of insurance benefits to health care provider, § 56-7-120.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Occupation tax on podiatrists, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19, part 1.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

63-3-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of podiatric medical examiners; and

“Division” means the division of health related boards of the department of health.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.15 (Williams, § 7182.16); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-302; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 4; 2005, ch. 228, § 1.

63-3-103. Board of podiatric medical examiners — Members.

A board of examiners is established, to be known by the name and title of “board of podiatric medical examiners.”

The governor shall appoint four (4) persons who have been licensed podiatrists for a period of at least two (2) years in this state as members of this board. The terms of office shall be for four (4) years. In making appointments to the board of podiatric medical examiners, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

Upon the expiration of the term of a member, the governor shall appoint the member's successor for a term of four (4) years.

The governor has the power to remove from office members of the board for neglect of duties as required by this chapter, or for malfeasance in office and incompetency or for unprofessional conduct. The governor has the authority to fill any vacancy caused by the removal of any member of the board by the member's resignation or death, from a list of all licensed podiatrists who have practiced not less than two (2) years in this state.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.13 (Williams, § 7182.14); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-303; Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 40; 1993, ch. 181, § 2; 2005, ch. 228, § 2; 2009, ch. 422, §§ 1, 2, 12.

Compiler's Notes. The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of health related boards in the department of health.

The board of podiatric medical examiners, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Cross-References. Prevention of HIV transmission, rulemaking authority, § 68-11-222.

63-3-104. Organization, meetings and compensation of board.

The board shall elect a chair and a secretary from its own members.

The board shall hold one (1) regular meeting in each year and such additional meetings at such times and places as it may determine.

Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per diem when actually engaged in the discharge of official duties and, in addition, shall be reimbursed for all travel and other necessary expenses. All expenses shall be claimed and paid in accordance with prevailing travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.13 (Williams, § 7182.14); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 1; 1973, ch. 393, § 3; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(111); T.C.A., § 63-304; Acts 2009, ch. 422, § 3.

63-3-105. Disposition of fees — Expenditures.

All fees and moneys from whatever source coming into the hands of the board shall be paid by the board to the state treasurer and become a part of the general fund.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall make allotments out of the general fund for the proper expenditures of the board, and no expenditure may be made by the board until allotment therefor has been made by the commissioner. The allotments for the operation of the board shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of the state.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.13 (Williams, § 7182.14); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1971, ch. 188, §§ 1-3; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-305.

63-3-106. General powers of board.

The board has the powers and duties, in addition to powers and duties granted to or imposed upon it by the other sections of this chapter, to:

Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary to govern its proceedings and carry into effect the purpose of this chapter;

Conduct examinations to ascertain the qualifications and fitness of applicants for a license to practice podiatry in this state;

Provide standards by which podiatry schools and colleges shall be approved;

Direct the division to issue a license for applicants who successfully pass the examination for the practice of podiatry;

Conduct hearings, to revoke or suspend any license or certificate under the authority of this chapter or any previous laws authorizing the holder thereof to practice podiatry for violations by a licensee of any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the board properly adopted and promulgated by the board; and

Sponsor, conduct or approve such educational programs as are necessary to carry out and make effective this chapter.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.2; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 161, § 3; Acts 1971, ch. 188, §§ 1, 5; 1973, ch. 393, § 5; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-306; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 5.

63-3-107. Unlawful practice.

It is unlawful for any person to practice or attempt to practice podiatry in this state unless such person has been issued a valid and current license to practice podiatry by this board as provided by this chapter.

If any person uses any name or title that would designate that person as a podiatrist or imply that that person was or is qualified to practice podiatry under this chapter, it is deemed prima facie evidence of practicing within the meaning of this chapter.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.2; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 161, § 3; Acts 1971, ch. 188, §§ 1, 5; 1973, ch. 393, § 5; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-307; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 6.

63-3-108. Exemptions.

This chapter shall not apply to the commissioned physicians and surgeons of the United States army, navy, air force or marine hospital service in the actual performance of their official duties, nor to physicians and surgeons or to osteopathic physicians and surgeons regularly licensed under the laws of this state, nor to visiting podiatrists called into consultation in this state from another state where they are duly qualified under the laws of that state to practice podiatry.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; 1949, ch. 152, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.3 (Williams, § 7182.4); modified; Acts 1973, ch. 393, § 6; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-308.

63-3-109. Academic license — License to practice — Requirements — Podiatrists licensed in other states.

Any person desiring an academic license to participate in a residency program shall:

Apply on a form prescribed by the board or via online application for an academic license;

Pay a fee as determined by the board; and

Have a residency program accepted by the board certify that the applicant has been accepted for its program.

The academic license shall terminate upon the applicant leaving the residency program.

Any person desiring to become licensed to practice podiatry in this state must:

Make application to the secretary of the board on a form prescribed by the board;

Pay an application fee as determined by the board;

Pass the examination conducted or accepted by the board; and

Successfully complete at least a one-year residency program approved by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education or its successor organization.

The board shall have the authority to issue locum tenens licenses to podiatrists licensed in another state who wish to practice podiatry in this state for a limited period of time and who meet all the requirements established by the board by rule for a locum tenens license.

Acts 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-309; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 7; 1986, ch. 675, § 14; 1990, ch. 886, § 1; 2009, ch. 422, §§ 4-7; 2014, ch. 949, § 4.

63-3-110. Qualifications of applicants — Educational standards.

No person shall be entitled to take any examination for a license unless that person furnishes the board with satisfactory proof that the person is at least eighteen (18) years of age, is of good moral character and has graduated from a college of podiatric medicine which is accredited by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education or its successor organization.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; 1935, ch. 60, § 1; 1949, ch. 152, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.3 (Williams, § 7182.4); Acts 1971, ch. 161, § 2; 1971, ch. 188, §§ 1, 6; 1973, ch. 393, § 8; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-310; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 8; 2009, ch. 422, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-3-111. Contents of examination — Grade requirement — Fee.

The board may conduct examinations at such times and places as it may designate.

Examinations shall be in the English language, written and clinical, and shall include subjects of histology, surgery, hygiene, dermatology, anatomy, physiology, chemistry, bacteriology, pathology, diagnosis and treatment, materia medica and therapeutics, and clinical podiatry and such additional subjects as are pertinent to podiatry; but such examinations shall be so limited in their scope as to cover only the requirements for podiatry education as provided in this chapter.

The board may accept the report of the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners on any examinee.

The board shall establish the minimum passing grade by regulation.

The board may set an examination fee.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.5 (Williams, § 7182.6); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 1; 1973, ch. 393, § 9; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-311; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 9; 1990, ch. 886, § 2; 2009, ch. 422, § 9.

63-3-112. Reexamination.

An applicant who fails to pass an examination satisfactory to the board, and is therefore refused a license, is entitled, within six (6) months after such refusal, to a reexamination upon payment of an additional fee as set annually by the board for each such reexamination.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.7 (Williams, § 7182.8); Acts 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-312; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 10; 1986, ch. 675, § 15; 1989, ch. 523, § 65.

63-3-113. Issuance of licenses.

If an applicant successfully passes the examination provided by this chapter and meets all of the requirements of this chapter, the board shall direct the division to issue the applicable license.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; 1949, ch. 152, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.3 (Williams, § 7182.4); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 7; 1973, ch. 393, § 10; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-313; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 11.

63-3-114. Reciprocity.

The board, in its discretion, may waive the examination required by § 63-3-109(c)(3) and may issue a license to any applicant who holds or possesses a valid license to practice podiatry in another state; provided, that the requirements for licensure in such state are, in the opinion of the board, at least equivalent to the requirements for licensure provided by this chapter and that such applicant pays a fee as set by the board.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.4 (Williams, § 7182.5); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 8; 1973, ch. 393, § 11; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-314; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 12; 1989, ch. 523, § 66.

63-3-115. Renewal of license.

Each person licensed to practice as a podiatrist in this state shall biennially apply to the board for renewal of the person's license and shall pay a renewal fee set by the board. A podiatrist who fails to renew the license by the date of expiration of the license shall not continue to practice as a podiatrist in this state.

A podiatrist who fails to timely renew the license may seek reinstatement from the board. The board may reinstate the license upon good cause shown, upon payment of all past due renewal fees and a late renewal fee and upon compliance with any other reasonable conditions imposed by the board.

The board may utilize the renewal system described in § 63-1-107.

Any licensed podiatrist who has retired from practice in this state shall not be required to renew the license if the person retired from practice files with the board an affidavit of retirement on a form furnished by the board. The affidavit shall state the date on which the person retired from practice and such other facts as the board deems necessary to verify retirement. If the person thereafter wishes to reenter practice in this state, the person shall apply for license reactivation, pay the reactivation fee set by the board and meet such other reasonable requirements deemed necessary by the board.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.16 (Williams, § 7182.17); Acts 1973, ch. 393, § 12; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-315; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 13; 1986, ch. 675, § 16; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 67, 68; 2005, ch. 228, § 4.

63-3-116. Continuing medical education — Exemptions.

As a condition of the biennial renewal of a podiatrist license, every licensed podiatrist must obtain at least fifteen (15) hours of continuing medical education each calendar year in programs approved by the board. The only basis upon which a podiatrist may seek an exemption from this requirement or an extension of time for meeting this requirement is illness or disability.

Podiatrists who have properly retired their licenses pursuant to § 63-3-115(d) are exempt from the requirement of subsection (a).

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 5; 1949, ch. 152, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.17 (Williams, § 7182.18); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 9; 1974, ch. 495, § 7; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-316; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 14; 1986, ch. 675, §§ 3, 17; 1988, ch. 600, § 1; 1989, ch. 360, § 17; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 69, 70; 2005, ch. 228, § 5.

63-3-117. Application of health laws.

Licensed podiatrists shall observe and be subject to all state and municipal regulations relating to the control of contagious and infectious diseases and all matters pertaining to public health, making reports to proper health officers in the same manner as other practitioners of the healing arts are required to make.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.20 (Williams, § 7182.21); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 1; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-317.

63-3-118. Services provided by physician assistant or orthopedic physician assistant collaborating with podiatrist.

A physician assistant collaborating with a licensed podiatrist shall not provide services that are outside of the scope of practice of a podiatrist as set forth in § 63-3-101 and may prescribe only drugs that are rational to the practice of podiatry. An orthopedic physician assistant collaborating with a licensed podiatrist shall not provide services that are outside of the scope of practice of a podiatrist as set forth in § 63-3-101.

Acts 2016, ch. 946, § 2; 2018, ch. 610, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-3-118 (Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.21 (Williams, § 7182.22); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 1; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-318), concerning jury duty exemption for licensed podiatrists, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 6, effective January 1, 2009.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “collaborating with” for “supervised by” in the first and second sentences.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 610, § 42. July 1, 2018.

63-3-119. Suspension or revocation of license — Enforcement.

The board has the duty and authority to suspend for a specified time, within the discretion of the board or to revoke any license to practice podiatry or to otherwise discipline any licensee or refuse to grant any certificate of fitness whenever the licensee or applicant is found guilty of any of the following acts or offenses:

Fraud in procuring a license or certificate;

Conviction of a felony, conviction of any offense under state or federal drug laws or conviction of any offense involving moral turpitude;

Habitual intoxication or personal misuse of any drugs;

Immoral, unethical, unprofessional or dishonorable conduct;

Solicitation by agents or persons or profiting by the acts of those representing themselves to be agents of the licensee or the certificate holder;

Division of fees or agreeing to split or divide fees received for professional services with any person for bringing or referring a patient;

Professional connection or association with any person, firm or corporation in any manner in an effort to avoid and circumvent this chapter or lending one's name to another for the illegal practice of podiatry by such person;

Violation or attempted violation, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate this chapter or any lawful order of the board; issued pursuant thereto, or any criminal statute of this state;

Giving of testimonials, directly or indirectly, concerning the supposed virtue of secret therapeutic agents or proprietary preparations, such as remedies, vaccines or other articles or materials that are offered to the public, claiming radical cure or prevention of disease by their use;

Any other unprofessional or unethical conduct that may be specified by the board from time to time by means of rules and regulations duly published and promulgated by the board or the violation of any provision of this chapter;

Making false statements or representations or being guilty of fraud or deceit in the practice of podiatry;

Invasion of a field of practice in which the licensee is not licensed to practice or is not within the limits of the licensee's respective callings;

Dispensing, prescribing or otherwise distributing any controlled substance or any other drug not in the course of professional practice or not in good faith to relieve pain and suffering, or not to cure an ailment, physical infirmity or disease;

Dispensing, prescribing or otherwise distributing any controlled substance, controlled substance analogue or any other drug to any person in violation of any law of the state or of the United States;

Practicing podiatry under any trade name or a name designating a given location or the name of another podiatrist or any name other than that which appears on the practitioner's license or using any title other than “podiatrist”; provided, that “foot specialist” may be used as an explanatory term of the title “podiatrist” and not alone or as a substitute for the title “podiatrist”;

Willful violation of the rules and regulations that may be promulgated by the board of podiatric medical examiners to regulate advertising by practitioners who are under the jurisdiction of the board;

Making or signing in one's professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time one makes or signs such certificate;

Engaging in the practice of podiatry when mentally or physically unable to safely do so; or

Gross health care liability or a pattern of continued or repeated health care liability, ignorance, negligence or incompetence in the course of the practice of podiatry.

The board of podiatric medical examiners may adopt rules and regulations to regulate the nature, manner, content and extent of advertising by practitioners who are under the jurisdiction of the board. All methods must be allowed such as: newspaper, radio and television.

For purposes of enforcement of this section, the board shall, upon probable cause, have authority to compel an applicant or licensee to submit to a mental and/or physical examination by a designated committee of at least three (3) practicing physicians, including a psychiatrist where a question of mental condition may be involved.

The applicant or licensee shall have the right to have an independent medical practitioner present during such examination and to have an independent physical or mental examination, the report of which shall be filed with the board for consideration.

The committee will submit a report of its findings to the board, which will then hold a hearing as provided in § 63-3-120.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.8 (Williams, § 7182.9); Acts 1971, ch. 188, §§ 1, 10; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-319; Acts 1985, ch. 120, §§ 2-6; 2005, ch. 228, § 3; 2009, ch. 422, § 10; 2012, ch. 798, § 34; 2012, ch. 848, § 66; 2018, ch. 745, § 22.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocations, § 63-6-214.

63-3-120. Administrative procedure.

All proceedings for disciplinary action against a licensee under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.9 (Williams, § 7182.10); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 1; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-320; Acts 1985, ch. 120, § 7.

Cross-References. Review of quasi-judicial bodies generally, title 27, ch. 9.

63-3-121. Enjoining violations.

The board, in addition to the powers and duties expressly granted by this chapter in the matter of suspension or revocation of a license and in the matter of the refusal to issue a certificate, is authorized and empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court, having jurisdiction, to enjoin any person who is practicing or attempting to practice podiatry without possessing a valid license to so practice and to enjoin any person, firm or corporation from performing any act or rendering any service that constitutes the practice of podiatry as defined by this chapter. No injunction bond shall be required of the board.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of the state to hear and determine such causes as chancery causes and to exercise full and complete jurisdiction in such injunctive proceedings.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.10 (Williams, § 7182.11); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 1; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-321.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

63-3-122. District attorneys to assist board.

The board at all times has the power to call upon the district attorneys general for the state in the various districts to assist the board.

It is hereby declared to be the duty of all district attorneys general throughout the state to assist the board, upon its request, in any suit for injunction or prosecution instituted by the board without charge or additional compensation to the district attorneys general.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; 1949, ch. 152, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.11 (Williams, § 7182.12); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 1; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-322.

63-3-123. Criminal penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Upon being convicted of any violation of any provision of this chapter, any person who again violates any of the provisions of this chapter commits a Class E felony.

Any person who has been enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction from performing any acts or rendering any services that constitute the practice of podiatry as defined by this chapter who thereafter willfully violates the terms of the injunction by again performing such acts or rendering such services commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.12 (Williams, § 7182.13); Acts 1971, ch. 188, § 1; 1976, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-323; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 79, 80, 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

63-3-124. Retail sales of foot appliances and shoes.

No part or portion of this chapter shall be deemed to prohibit the usual and customary commercial sale and adjustment of foot appliances and remedies or shoes in retail stores.

Acts 1931, ch. 31, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.22 (Williams, § 7182.23); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-326.

63-3-125. Regulations relating to X-ray procedures.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations that establish minimum educational standards and criteria for persons operating X-ray equipment for diagnostic purposes in podiatrist offices.

These regulations may include, but not be limited to, provisions for grandfathering, waiver, reciprocity, renewal, continuing education, fees, examination and hardship cases.

After the effective date of the rules and regulations, no person shall perform X-ray procedures in a podiatrist office who does not meet these standards and who has not received a certificate of proficiency from the board.

Acts 1990, ch. 886, § 3.

63-3-126. Cost of prosecution — Administering oaths.

The board shall promulgate rules governing the assessment of costs against a licensee or other person found by the board to have violated any provision of this chapter. The costs assessed by the board may include only those costs directly related to the prosecution of the charges against the licensee or other person, including investigatory costs where appropriate. The board shall determine the appropriate amount of costs, if any, to be assessed in a contested case. These costs shall be reasonable and proportionate in light of the violation committed by the licensee or other person.

Any elected officer of the board, or any duly appointed or elected chair has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses. Upon probable cause being established, the board, by a vote of two thirds (2/3) of the members to which the board is entitled, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

Service of a subpoena issued by the board shall be made by the sheriff of the county of residence of the licensee or person upon whom the subpoena is served.

A licensee or person served by subpoena shall have thirty (30) days to request in writing a hearing before the board for the sole purpose of making a special appearance to quash or modify the subpoena. The subpoena for attendance of the person or the production of books and records shall be stayed until the board votes upon the request to quash or modify the subpoena. A majority vote of the members to which the board is entitled shall be required to quash or modify a subpoena.

A motion to appeal from a decision by the board regarding a request to quash or modify a subpoena shall be made to the chancery court in Davidson County within fifteen (15) days of such decision.

If any witness fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by it, the board is authorized to make application to any court of record in this state within the jurisdiction of which the witness is found or resides; and the court shall have power to attach the body of the witness and compel the witness to appear before the board and give testimony or produce books, records or papers as ordered. Any failure to obey the court order may be punished by the court issuing the order as a civil contempt.

Each witness who appears before the board by order of the board shall receive for attendance the compensation provided by law for attendance of witnesses in a court of record, which shall be paid from the funds of the board in the same manner as all other expenses of the board are paid.

Acts 1999, ch. 437, § 3.

Cross-References. Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Attorney General Opinions. The board of registration in podiatry has authority to issue administrative subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents prior to the commencement of an administrative action, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS (4/10/01).

63-3-127. Drug prescriptions.

Any handwritten prescription order for a drug prepared by a podiatrist who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription. The handwritten prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing podiatrist, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, handwritten in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug and the month and day that the prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing podiatrist must sign the handwritten prescription order on the day it is issued, unless it is a standing order issued in a hospital, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201.

Any typed or computer-generated prescription order for a drug issued by a podiatrist who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription order. The typed or computer-generated prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing podiatrist, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, recorded in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug, and the month and day that the typed or computer-generated prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing podiatrist must sign the typed or computer-generated prescription order on the day it is issued, unless it is a standing order issued in a hospital, nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a podiatrist from issuing a verbal prescription order.

All handwritten, typed or computer-generated prescription orders must be issued on either tamper-resistant prescription paper or printed utilizing a technology that results in a tamper-resistant prescription that meets the current centers for medicare and medicaid service guidance to state medicaid directors regarding § 7002(b) of the United States Troop Readiness, Veterans' Care, Katrina Recovery, and Iraq Accountability Appropriations Act of 2007, P.L. 110-28, and meets or exceeds specific TennCare requirements for tamper-resistant prescriptions.

Subdivision (d)(1) shall not apply to prescriptions written for inpatients of a hospital, outpatients of a hospital where the doctor or other person authorized to write prescriptions writes the order into the hospital medical record and then the order is given directly to the hospital pharmacy and the patient never has the opportunity to handle the written order, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201 or inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33 or individuals incarcerated in a local, state or federal correctional facility.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 3; 2005, ch. 12, § 1; 2008, ch. 1035, §§ 2, 9; 2010, ch. 795, § 13; 2013, ch. 74, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 1 provided that the title of the act is and may be cited as the “Medication Error Reduction Act of 2004.”

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 2 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly to create a uniform standard that health care providers must follow in issuing written or electronic prescription orders. This standard is intended to reduce medication related errors, which represent a major source of medical errors in the health care system. The general assembly finds that reducing medical errors will result in greater safety for patients as well as cost savings for the health care system in this state. By adopting these standards, the general assembly intends to promote medical safety for all patients who are issued drug prescriptions in this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 11 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner's or pharmacist's ability to order the use of or distribute nonprescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 12 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 13 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of this act in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate health care providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 14 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before July 1, 2004.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner's or pharmacist's ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 10 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 11 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of the act in accordance with title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate healthcare providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 19 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before January 1, 2011.